Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 11 Local Police And Fire Pension And Relief Funds
24-11-433. Police pension funds — Partial disability pensions.

If a member of a police department of a city of the first class with a population in excess of one hundred seventy thousand (170,000) persons as determined by the 1990 population totals as published by the United States Bureau of the Census becomes physically or mentally permanently partially disabled and this fact is certified by a physician named by the local board of trustees, the member of the police department shall be entitled to retire and receive a pension as provided in this section.

A member of the police department shall not be retired for disability for natural causes unless he or she has served at least five (5) years.

The physician's certification shall state whether the disability is total or partial.

In the event such disability is partial, the physician shall state the extent of such partial disability, apportioned to the body as a whole, in percentage terms.

If the disability injury or disease occurred while not actually performing work in gainful employment for the police department and the physician certifies that such disability is total, the monthly benefit shall be equal to the benefit paid to normal service retirants.

If the physician certifies that such disability is partial, the monthly benefits shall be equal to the benefit paid to normal service retirants multiplied by the percentage the member is disabled, as certified by the physician.

If, however, a police officer is injured in the line of duty and the physician certifies that such disability is total, the monthly disability benefit shall either be equal to sixty-five percent (65%) of the salary attached to the rank held by the member in the police department or shall be equal to the benefit paid to normal service retirants, whichever is greater.

If the physician certifies that such disability is partial, the monthly benefit shall be equal to sixty-five percent (65%) of the salary attached to the rank held by the member in the police department or shall be equal to the benefit paid to normal service retirants, whichever is greater, multiplied by the percentage the member is disabled, as certified by the physician.

The local board of trustees shall determine whether the disability occurred in the line of duty and may require any medical evidence, official reports, expert testimony, or other information to be supplied by the police officer in addition to the required physician's examination.

The additional benefits provided in this section shall be effective for all qualifying applications first received by the local board of trustees on or after January 1, 1987.

For purposes of this section, “injured in the line of duty” means to have sustained a disabling injury or disease while the member of the police department is conducting official police department operations or training to become a police officer.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1168, § 1; 2013, No. 41, § 17.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment deleted “member of the board” or “member”
following “physician” throughout the section; rewrote (a)(1); substituted “A member of the police department shall not” for “No member shall” in (a)(2); deleted former (b)(3) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; in (c), substituted “local board of trustees” for “board” and
“police officer” for “applicant”; substituted “local board of trustees” for “board” in (d); and rewrote (e).

24-11-434. Deferred retirement option plan.

In lieu of terminating employment and accepting a service retirement pension under this subchapter, a police officer who is a member of a policemen's pension and relief fund who has not less than twenty (20) years of credited service and who is eligible to receive a service retirement pension may elect to participate in the Arkansas Police Officers' Deferred Retirement Option Plan and defer the receipt of benefits in accordance with the provisions of this section, provided that the board of trustees of the local policemen's pension and relief fund approves the participation in the plan.

For purposes of this section, credited service includes service credit recognized pursuant to this subchapter.

The duration of participation in the plan for active police officers shall not exceed five (5) years.

The five-year limit may be extended if:

The extension does not cause the limit to exceed ten (10) years;

The extension applies to all active members and all members on the plan;

The extension is approved by a majority of votes of the board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund or of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System for funds whose administrative responsibility has been assigned to the system as provided in § 24-11-406(b);

The interest credited after the first five (5) years on the plan shall be two (2) percentage points below the rate of return of the investment portfolio of the fund and shall not be determined under subdivision (e)(2) of this section, but in no event shall the interest rate credited be less than zero percent (0%); and

The extension is approved by a majority vote of the governing body of the sponsoring municipality.

Except under subdivisions (c)(2) and (3) of this section, at the conclusion of a member's participation in the plan, the member shall terminate employment with all participating municipalities as a police officer and shall start receiving the member's accrued monthly retirement benefit from the policemen's pension and relief fund.

If a member is at the conclusion of a member's participation in the plan, the member may continue employment by a municipality under the following conditions:

The municipality makes continued employment available to all similarly situated members;

The availability of continued employment is approved by a majority vote of the governing body of the sponsoring municipality after receiving approval for an increase in benefits under § 24-11-102;

The monthly benefit that is credited to the member's plan account is discontinued and the member shall not receive a monthly benefit until the member actually ceases employment;

The interest rate credited to the plan account is the same paid as under subdivision (e)(2) of this section, except that the minimum rate is zero percent (0%);

The employer's matching contribution of six percent (6%) shall cease, but all other employer contributions shall continue and be credited to the policemen's pension and relief fund; and

The employee contributions of six percent (6%) shall discontinue.

A member may enter into employment with a participating municipality so long as the member has a break of service from his or her previous employment of at least thirty (30) days as a police officer, begins employment in a law enforcement position, and becomes a member of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

Subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this section applies to a member of a local policemen's pension and relief fund after the break in service regardless of the original date of hire of the member by a municipality that participates in the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

Retroactive application applies only if the member and employer contributions have been made under this chapter.

When a member begins participation in the plan, the contribution of the police officer and the employer contribution shall continue to be paid.

In a municipality having a population of over twenty thousand (20,000) persons, municipal matching contributions for employees who elect the plan shall be credited equally to the policemen's pension and relief fund and to the plan, or at the option of the local pension and relief fund board of trustees, credited in the manner provided in subdivision (d)(2)(B) of this section.

In a municipality having a population of twenty thousand (20,000) persons or less, municipal matching contributions for employees who elect the plan shall be credited in full to the policemen's pension and relief fund, and the contribution of the employee shall be credited to the member's plan account.

The monthly retirement benefits that would have been payable had the member elected to cease employment and receive service retirement and pension supplement payments made by the Arkansas Policemen's Pension Supplement Program shall be paid into the plan account.

The member's monthly retirement benefit shall not change unless the plan receives a benefit increase.

A member who participates in this plan shall earn interest at a rate of two (2) percentage points below the rate of return of the investment portfolio of the policemen's pension and relief fund as certified by the actuary under contract with the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board in accordance with generally accepted actuarial practices and § 24-11-207, but no less than the actuarial assumed interest rate as certified by the actuary.

The interest shall be credited to the individual account balance of the member on an annual basis.

At the option of the participant, a participant in the plan shall receive a lump-sum payment from the account equal to the payments to the account or a true annuity based upon the account of the participant or may elect any other method of payment if approved by the board of trustees.

If approved by a majority vote of the governing body of the sponsoring municipality and the board of trustees, a participant in the deferred retirement option plan may defer receiving payment of the participant's account and continue with the funds deposited into the plan.

Interest credited to the continuing deposit of funds in the plan under subdivision (f)(2) of this section shall be calculated in the same manner as interest under subdivision (e)(2) of this section.

However, the minimum interest rate shall not be less than zero percent (0%).

The payment of funds accumulated while participating in the deferred retirement option plan may be deferred only one (1) time. These funds must be distributed or annuitized by December 31 of the year a member attains age seventy and one-half (70 ½).

If the participant dies during the period of participation in the plan, a lump-sum payment equal to the account balance of the participant shall be paid.

A participant in the plan shall not receive any benefits under the plan unless he or she participates in the plan for a minimum of one (1) year, absent death or disability.

The Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board may promulgate rules to make the plan under this section comply with the requirements of this section and with the applicable portions of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2003.

Although the police officer may remain employed by the participating municipality, any member who opts to participate in the plan shall be considered to be retired for all retirement purposes, including, but not limited to, benefit increase purposes and the extension of benefits to the spouses of deceased members.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 757, § 1; 1995, No. 961, § 1; 1997, No. 492, § 1; 1999, No. 670, § 3; 1999, No. 1457, § 1; 1999, No. 1459, § 1; 2001, No. 1543, § 5; 2003, No. 1371, §§ 1, 2; 2003, No. 1372, §§ 1, 2; 2005, No. 258, § 1; 2007, No. 1572, § 1; 2013, No. 41, § 18; 2013, No. 1102, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2901.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment by No. 41, in (a)(1), substituted “a police officer” for “any police officer” and “Deferred Retirement” for “Deferred”; and substituted “includes” for “shall include” in (a)(2).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1102 redesignated (c)(3) as (c)(3)(A); in (c)(3)(A), deleted “other than the municipality he or she was employed by at the time of retirement” following “participating municipality,” substituted “employment” for “employer,” and inserted “as a police officer, begins employment in a law enforcement position, and becomes a member of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System”; and added (c)(3)(B)(i) and (c)(3)(B)(ii).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (i).

24-11-435. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning buy-out option, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 41, § 19. The section was derived from Acts 1995, No. 1012, § 1.

24-11-436. Military service.

If a member of a policemen's pension and relief fund who while an employee enters the United States Armed Forces during any period of compulsory or voluntary military service, the service shall be credited under this subchapter.

In any case of doubt as to the period of armed service to be so credited a member under this section, the board of trustees of the pension fund shall determine the period.

Except for service credited under subsection (d) of this section, a member of a policemen's pension and relief fund shall not be credited with a total of more than five (5) years of armed service.

During the period of armed service and until the member's return as an employee, his or her contributions to the pension fund shall be suspended, and any balance remaining to the member's credit in the pension fund shall be accumulated at regular interest.

Under the requirements of the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, 38 U.S.C. § 4312, in effect October 13, 1996, a member who leaves covered employment to serve in the uniformed services of the United States after giving notice to the employer and who returns to employment shall be treated as not having incurred a break in service with the employer.

The employer shall certify to the pension fund that reemployment was in accordance with the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, 38 U.S.C. § 4312, as in effect October 13, 1996.

Under this subsection, the uniformed services of the United States are limited to the United States Armed Forces, the Army National Guard and Air National Guard when engaged in active duty for training, state active duty, inactive duty training, or full-time National Guard duty, the United States Commissioned Corps of the Public Health Service, and any other category of persons designated by the President of the United States in time of war or national emergency.

The cumulative length of the absence from a position of employment with the employer by reason of service in the uniformed services for which service credit shall be given shall not exceed five (5) years.

A member of a policemen's pension and relief fund whose uniformed service is honorably terminated and who reports for reemployment under this subsection within the time provided in the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, 38 U.S.C. § 4312, shall be entitled to accrue benefits for the time he or she served in the uniformed services by paying the employee contributions required by § 24-11-413, if any, within the time provided in the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, 38 U.S.C. § 4312, and by repaying any amount he or she may have previously withdrawn from the pension fund, with interest.

An employer reemploying a member of a policemen's pension and relief fund under this subsection shall pay to the pension fund the employer contributions due for the time he or she served in the uniformed services as required under § 24-11-413.

However, if a member of a policemen's pension and relief fund does not pay the employee contributions due, then no employer contributions are due.

For the purposes of determining the employee and employer contributions due, the compensation for a member of a policemen's pension and relief fund during the period of service in the uniformed services shall be computed at:

The rate he or she would have received if the member of a policemen's pension and relief fund had not served in the uniformed services; or

The average compensation level for the member of a policemen's pension and relief fund during the twelve-month period, or shorter if applicable, immediately preceding the service.

Unless both employee and employer contributions are paid, the member of a policemen's pension and relief fund shall not be entitled to any accrued benefits for the time served in the uniformed services.

If a member dies on or after January 1, 2007, while performing qualified military service under the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act, Pub. L. No. 103-353, he or she shall be treated as though he or she resumed covered employment on the day before the day of death.

For a member of a policemen's pension and relief fund who had not attained a vested status in the pension fund, sufficient service credit shall accrue to permit him or her to become vested.

For a member of a policemen's pension and relief fund who had attained a vested status, additional service credit accrual shall not occur.

In all cases, the eligible benefit awarded by the pension fund under this section shall be a nonduty death benefit.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1290, § 1; 2013, No. 41, § 20; 2019, No. 474, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment deleted “Credit for” at the beginning of the section heading, and rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment, in (d)(2), inserted “state active duty” and substituted “United States Commissioned Corps of the Public Health Service” for “United States Public Health Service Commissioned Corps”.

24-11-437. Credited service — Purchase of former law enforcement service.

If the local board of trustees for a policemen's pension and relief fund decides to extend this benefit for its members and if the pension fund will be actuarially sound as determined by the actuary for the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board after this benefit increase is extended to members, any member of the policemen's pension and relief fund as established by this subchapter shall be entitled to purchase credited service in the system, not to exceed five (5) years, for service rendered by the member as a law enforcement officer in this state prior to the member's employment covered by the policemen's pension and relief fund.

The member may purchase the credited service if:

The member is an active member with at least twenty (20) years' actual service in the policemen's pension and relief fund and contributes to the pension fund an amount that is the actuarial equivalent of the value of the credited service to be purchased; and

The actuarial equivalent is of the time of the purchase of the credited service and shall be determined by the actuary for the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board, or for a pension fund under administration of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System by the actuary for that system.

Service that is or will be eligible for benefit payment from another plan shall not be eligible for purchase under the pension fund.

The board of trustees of the pension fund shall make the final determination as to the:

Length of purchased service credit;

Amount of regular interest to be charged; and

Manner in which payment is made to the pension fund.

Service credit purchased under this section shall be used to determine the member's total credited service under the pension fund but shall not be used to determine his or her final average pay under the pension fund.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 903, § 1; 2013, No. 41, § 21.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment, in (a), substituted “local board” for “board” and “five (5) years” for “two (2) years”; rewrote (b) through (d); and added (e).

24-11-438. Police-related service.

Any member of a policemen's pension and relief fund who has police-related service with the municipal government shall be entitled to purchase credited service in the system equivalent to the amount of employment service he or she has with the municipal police department in a position as police-related employment service up to a maximum of three (3) years of credited service, provided that the member contributes to the system an amount the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board determines would be actuarially equivalent to the value of the service purchased.

The board shall have the final power to determine the value of the service purchased.

Service credit purchased under this section may be used to determine the member's total credited service for the amount upon retirement and shall not be used to determine his or her final average pay for service under the system.

As used in this section, “police-related service” means service with a municipality that has police officers covered under a policemen's pension and relief fund in a job or in a paid position within a covered police department or fire department where the person performs duties that are related to the delivery of police and law enforcement services, including service such as a police department radio dispatcher or other similar service.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1171, § 1.

Subchapter 5
— Police Pension and Relief Funds — Cities of 50,000 to 75,000

24-11-501 — 24-11-520. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 920, § 1. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

24-11-501. Acts 1939, No. 25, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-502. Acts 1939, No. 25, § 22; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-503. Acts 1941, No. 16, §§ 1, 2, 4; 1985, No. 900, §§ 1, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-1707, 19-1708, 19-1710.

24-11-504. Acts 1939, No. 25, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-505. Acts 1939, No. 25, §§ 3, 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-506. Acts 1939, No. 25, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-507. Acts 1939, No. 25, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-508. Acts 1939, No. 25, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-509. Acts 1939, No. 25, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-510. Acts 1939, No. 25, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-511. Acts 1939, No. 25, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-512. Acts 1939, No. 25, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-513. Acts 1939, No. 25, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-514. Acts 1939, No. 25, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-515. Acts 1939, No. 25, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-516. Acts 1939, No. 25, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-517. Acts 1939, No. 25, §§ 7, 9, 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-518. Acts 1939, No. 25, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-519. Acts 1939, No. 25, §§ 8, 13, 19; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-520. Acts 1939, No. 25, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

Subchapter 6
— Police Pension and Relief Funds — Cities of 40,000 to 50,000

24-11-601 — 24-11-615. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 920, § 1. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

24-11-601. Acts 1921, No. 343, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-602. Acts 1921, No. 343, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-603. Acts 1921, No. 343, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-604. Acts 1921, No. 343, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-605. Acts 1921, No. 343, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-606. Acts 1921, No. 343, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-607. Acts 1921, No. 343, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-608. Acts 1921, No. 343, §§ 4, 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-609. Acts 1921, No. 343, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-610. Acts 1921, No. 343, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-611. Acts 1921, No. 343, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-612. Acts 1921, No. 343, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-613. Acts 1921, No. 343, §§ 8, 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-614. Acts 1921, No. 343, §§ 9, 12, 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

24-11-615. Acts 1921, No. 343, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1827n.

Subchapter 7
— Police Pension and Relief Funds — Cities of 3,000 to 8,000

24-11-701 — 24-11-719. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 920, § 1. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

24-11-701. Acts 1941, No. 387, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2020.

24-11-702. Acts 1941, No. 387, § 22; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2021.

24-11-703. Acts 1941, No. 387, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2001.

24-11-704. Acts 1941, No. 387, §§ 3, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-2003, 19-2004.

24-11-705. Acts 1941, No. 387, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2012.

24-11-706. Acts 1941, No. 387, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2017.

24-11-707. Acts 1941, No. 387, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2014.

24-11-708. Acts 1941, No. 387, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2005.

24-11-709. Acts 1941, No. 387, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2006.

24-11-710. Acts 1941, No. 387, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2002.

24-11-711. Acts 1941, No. 387, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2011.

24-11-712. Acts 1941, No. 387, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2015.

24-11-713. Acts 1941, No. 387, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2016.

24-11-714. Acts 1941, No. 387, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2009.

24-11-715. Acts 1941, No. 387, §§ 7, 9, 10; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-2007, 19-2009, 19-2010.

24-11-716. Acts 1941, No. 387, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2007.

24-11-717. Acts 1941, No. 387, §§ 8, 13, 19; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-2008, 19-2013, 19-2019.

24-11-718. Acts 1941, No. 387, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2002.

24-11-719. Acts 1941, No. 387, § 18; 1981, No. 438, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2018.